Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-717
Construction near airports; hearing; order.

The commission shall determine from the evidence presented at the hearing held pursuant to section 75-714 whether the applicant has made adequate allowance for the proper glide angles for the landing of aircraft at the airport concerned and shall determine, in conformity with the provisions of section 75-721, what order should be entered in the premises.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 17, p. 1426;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 128.